Idaho, session 2025, S1149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 55-103, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-103. WHO MAY OWN PROPERTY. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, any person, whether citizen or alien, may take, hold, and
dispose of property, real or personal.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and af-
ter the effective date of this subsection, a foreign government or a foreign
state-controlled enterprise shall not purchase, acquire, or hold any con-
trolling interest in agricultural land, forest land, water rights, mining
claims, or mineral rights in the state of Idaho. This subsection does not
apply to any interest in agricultural land, water rights, mining claims, or
mineral rights acquired by a foreign government or foreign state-controlled
enterprise prior to the effective date of this subsection or to any foreign
pension fund.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural land" shall have the same meaning as "land actively
devoted to agricultural purposes" as provided in section 63-604, Idaho
Code.
(b) "Controlling interest" means:
(i) Possession of more than fifty percent (50%) of the ownership
interest in an entity; or
(ii) A percentage of ownership interest in an entity that is fifty
percent (50%) or less if a foreign government actually directs the
business and affairs of the entity without the requirement or con-
sent of any other party.
(c) "Foreign government" means a government other than the federal gov-
ernment of the United States or the government of any state, political
subdivision of a state, territory, federally recognized Indian tribe,
or possession of the United States.
(d) "Forest land" means privately owned or state-owned land being held
and used primarily for the continuous purpose of growing and harvesting
trees of a marketable species. Having met the above criteria, forest
land may be further identified by the consideration of any of the fol-
lowing criteria:
(i) Forest land is land evidenced by present use and silvicul-
tural treatment.


(ii) Forest land is land which has a dedicated use that is further
evidenced by a forest land management plan that includes eventual
harvest of the forest crop.
(iii) Forest land is land bearing forest growth or land which has
not been converted to another use.
(iv) Forest land is land which has had the trees removed by man
through harvest, including clear-cuts or by natural disaster,
such as but not limited to fire, and which within five (5) years af-
ter harvest or initial assessment will be reforested as specified
in the forest practices act, (chapter 13, title 38, Idaho Code).
(e) "Foreign pension fund" means a trust, corporation, or other entity
created or organized under the law of a country other than the United
States to provide retirement or pension fund benefits. However, the
term "foreign pension fund" shall not include any trust, corporation,
or other entity that is owned by or subject to a controlling interest of
a sovereign wealth fund.
(f) "Mineral right" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
47-701, Idaho Code.
(g) "Mining claim" means a portion of land containing minerals that a
miner has a right to occupy and possess for the purpose of extracting
minerals.
(h) "State-controlled enterprise" means a business enterprise, how-
ever denominated, sovereign wealth fund, or state-backed investment
fund in which a foreign government has a controlling interest.
(i) "Water right" shall have the same meaning as provided in section
42-230, Idaho Code.
(4)(a) The attorney general shall investigate acquisitions of inter-
ests in real property reasonably suspected of violating the prohibi-
tions provided for in subsection (2) of this section upon receipt of a
complaint alleging such violation.
(b) The attorney general shall enforce the prohibitions provided for
in subsection (2) of this section for any interest in land, rights, or
claims held in violation of the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section by petitioning the district court for an order and judgment
that: finds such violation; appoints a receiver; and authorizes the
receiver to sell such land, rights, or claims. For a receivership pro-
ceeding under this section:
(i) Proceeds of the sale shall be disbursed to lienholders, in
order of priority, except for liens that, under the terms of the
sale, are to remain on the land, rights, or claims;
(ii) At the receivership sale, lienholders shall be permitted to
have a credit bid; and
(iii) Any excess proceeds shall be disbursed to the owner of record
of the real property.
(c) Upon the commencement of an action provided for in this section, the
attorney general shall promptly file a notice of lis pendens with the
court.
(d) Upon the entry of a court order appointing a receiver and authoriz-
ing the receiver's powers to sell the property pursuant to the provi-
sions of this section, the attorney general shall promptly record a copy


of the court order in the office of the county where the property is lo-
cated that is responsible for the maintenance of property records.
(e) No title to land, rights, or claims shall be invalid or subject to
divestiture due to a violation of the provisions of this section by any
former owner or other individual or entity having formerly held or owned
an interest in the real property.
(f) Divestiture of a foreign government's or foreign state-controlled
enterprise's title under this section shall not be a basis to void,
invalidate, or otherwise extinguish any bona fide mortgage, lien, or
other interest granted by, through, or under the foreign government or
foreign state-controlled enterprise.
(g) No person or entity that is not a foreign government or a foreign
state-controlled enterprise shall bear any civil or criminal liability
for failing to determine or to make an inquiry about whether an indi-
vidual or other entity is a foreign government or a foreign state-con-
trolled enterprise.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.